Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB509.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.430 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the discharge of the duties imposed by KRS 199.420 to 199.670 the secretary or
his or her duly authorized representative may administer oaths and affirmations,
take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance
of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and
other records considered necessary and relevant as evidence in connection with the
administration of the cabinet. Such subpoena shall be served in the same manner as
a subpoena issued out of a circuit court. Witnesses subpoenaed shall be allowed
mileage allowance according to KRS 421.015 for each day their attendance is
actually required at a hearing.
(2) No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda or other records in response to such subpoena
on the grounds that the evidence required of him or her may tend to incriminate
him or subject him to a penalty for forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or
subjected to any suit, penalty, or forfeiture on account of any transaction, matter, or
thing concerning which he or she or his or her agent or worker is compelled, after
having claimed privilege against self-incrimination, to give evidence, except that
such witness so testifying shall not be exempt from punishment for perjury.
(3) All letters, reports, communications, and other matters, written or oral, to the
cabinet or any of its agents, representatives, or employees, or to any board or
official functioning under KRS 199.420 to 199.670, which have been written, sent,
or made in connection with the requirements and administration of the cabinet shall
be absolutely privileged and shall not be the subject matter or basis for any suit for
slander or libel in any court, but no person testifying before the secretary or his or
her duly authorized representative shall be exempt from punishment for perjury.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/28/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1959
Information obtained shall not be published or be open for public inspection, except
to public employees in the performance of their duties, but any interested party at a
hearing before the secretary or his or her duly authorized representative shall be
supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper
presentation of his or her case.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/28/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed